Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,113
Subscriber, defined.

Subscriber shall mean an individual whose employment or other status, except family dependency, is the basis for eligibility for enrollment in the health maintenance organization or, in the case of an individual contract, the individual in whose name the contract is issued.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 22.